Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1703
Business incubation centers; designation.

Upon receipt of a petition from a community board pursuant to section 72-1705, a public agency may designate, in whole or in part, vacant or partially vacant public buildings as business incubation centers for the purpose of encouraging and assisting the establishment and expansion of small businesses within this state. A community board may lease the building from the public agency.

Laws 1990, LB 409, § 3.